Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6804
Additional definitions.

Any term shall have the same meaning as used in Chapter 77, article 27, except as otherwise defined in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 4.